Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB36.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Leo Rosenblum Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Leo Rosenblum was the original founder and owner of Leo's Men's and Boy's Apparel clothing store at 2700 Germantown Avenue in Philadelphia, a business that has thrived in existence for over 70 years.(2) Mr. Rosenblum's beginnings were marked by great adversity, having witnessed the horrors of the Holocaust as a child.(3) Mr. Rosenblum became a resistance fighter against Hitler's German Army, where he was heralded as a hero and protector of innocent lives, saving many during the 12345678910111213141516171819 atrocities of World War II.(4) After the war, like many immigrants, Mr. Rosenblum sought a better life and settled in Philadelphia.(5) In 1954, Mr. Rosenblum seized the opportunity to own his own business, establishing Leo's Men's and Boy's Apparel, which he later moved in the early 1960s to 2705 Germantown Avenue, the location it still proudly occupies today.(6) Leo's Men's and Boy's Apparel, now managed by his son Dave Rosenblum, continues to serve the North Philadelphia community, maintaining the family legacy and embodying the vision of its founder.(7) Leo's is more than a clothing store, it is a cornerstone of the community, a place where individuals from all walks of life, ranging from famous R&B groups to local politicians, come to dress for success and it has also been a training ground for aspiring entrepreneurs and fashion designers.(8) The Rosenblum family has successfully carried on Mr. Rosenblum's legacy through three generations, ensuring that his dream lives on and continues to enrich the local community and its culture.(b) Designation.--The portion of State Route 4005, also known as Germantown Avenue, from West Lehigh Avenue to West Somerset Street in the City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County, is designated the Leo Rosenblum Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0036PN0014 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930